engpart.lexc
!!!engpart.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Part

LEXICON Root

Particle ;

LEXICON Particle

aback Part;
aboard Part;
about Part;
above Part;
abreast Part;
abroad Part;
across Part;
aground Part;
ahead Part;
aloft Part;
along Part;
apart Part;
around Part;
aside Part;
astray Part;
at Part;
away Part;
back Part;
behind Part;
below Part;
by Part;
counter Part;
down Part;
downstairs Part;
forth Part;
forward Part;
from Part;
home Part;
in Part;
indoors Part;
inside Part;
near Part;
off Part;
on Part;
onto Part;
out Part;
over Part;
overboard Part;
past Part;
round Part;
through Part;
to Part;
together Part;
under Part;
up Part;
upstairs Part;

LEXICON Part

[stem]+Part:0 #;
